Utah statutes.
38-1a-208.   Actions that are not adjudicative proceedings.

None of the following is an adjudicative proceeding under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act:

(1)  the filing of a notice permitted or required by this chapter;

(2)  the rejection of a filing permitted or required by this chapter; or

(3)  other action by the designated agent in connection with a filing of any notice permitted or required by this chapter.

